Utah statutes.
4-35-7.   Notice to owner or occupant -- Corrective action required --
Directive issued by department -- Costs -- Owner or occupant may prohibit
spraying.
(1)  The department or an authorized agent of the department shall notify the
owner or occupant of the problem and the available alternatives to remedy the
problem.  The owner or occupant shall take corrective action within 30 days.
(2)  If the owner or occupant fails to take corrective action under Subsection
(1), the department may issue a directive for corrective action which shall be
taken within 15 days.  If the owner or occupant fails to act within the
required time, the department shall take the necessary action.  The department
may recover costs incurred for controlling an insect infestation emergency
from the owner or occupant of the property on whose property corrective action
was taken.
(3)  Owners or occupants of property may prohibit spraying by presenting an
affidavit from their attending physician to the department which states that
the spraying as planned is a danger to their health.  The department shall
provide the owner or occupant with alternatives to spraying which will abate
the infestation.
